Nebraska, session 109, LB766.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 2-1205, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
2-1205 (1) If the commission is satisfied that its rules and
regulations and all provisions of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 have been and
will be complied with, it may issue a license to conduct a race or race
meeting for a period of not more than three years. The license shall set
forth the name of the licensee, the place where the races or race
meetings are to be held, and the time and number of days during which
racing may be conducted by such licensee. Any such license issued shall
not be transferable or assignable. The commission shall have the power to
revoke any license issued at any time for good cause upon reasonable
notice and hearing. No license shall be granted to any corporation or
association except upon the express condition that it shall not, by any
lease, contract, understanding, or arrangement of whatever kind or
nature, grant, assign, or turn over to any person, corporation, or
association the operation or management of any racing or race meeting
licensed under such sections or of the parimutuel system of wagering
described in section 2-1207 or in any manner permit any person,
corporation, or association other than the licensee to have any share,
percentage, or proportion of the money received for admissions to the
racing or race meeting or from the operation of the parimutuel system;
and any violation of such conditions shall authorize and require the
commission immediately to revoke such license. No licensee shall be
considered in violation of this section with respect to an agreement with
an authorized gaming operator regarding employees and the acceptance of
any parimutuel wager or sports wager pursuant to section 9-1110.
(2)(a) Any racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to
conduct a race or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 which is
in existence and operational as of April 20, 2022, shall:
(i) Hold a minimum of five live racing meet days and fifty live
horseraces annually beginning January 1, 2026, through December 31, 2030;
-2-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
and
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2031, hold a minimum of fifteen live
racing meet days and one hundred twenty live horseraces annually.
(b) Any racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to
conduct a race or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 which is
not in existence and operational until after April 20, 2022, shall:
(i) Hold a minimum of one live racing meet day annually for the
first three years of operation;
(ii) Hold a minimum of five live racing meet days and fifty live
horseraces annually for the fourth year of operation through the seventh
year of operation; and
(iii) Beginning with the eighth year of operation, hold a minimum of
fifteen live racing meet days and one hundred twenty live horseraces
annually.
(c) A racetrack that fails to meet the minimum requirements under
this subsection is subject to discipline by the commission, including
revocation of the license issued under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218.
(3) Any holder of a racetrack enclosure license pursuant to section
2-1210 that is licensed to conduct a race or race meeting under this
section may petition the commission to waive or modify the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section. The petition shall contain the reasons
and justification for such waiver or modification and be submitted in
writing to the executive director of the commission. A petition submitted
more than seven days prior to the next scheduled meeting of the
commission shall be taken up at such meeting. A petition submitted less
than seven days prior to the next scheduled meeting of the commission
shall not be required to be taken up at such meeting but shall be taken
up at a following meeting. The commission may waive or modify the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section for any reason, including,
but not limited to, fire, earthquake, tornado, other natural disaster, or
other conditions making it unsuitable for running horseraces.
-3-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
(4) (3) A racetrack for which a licensee is issued a license to
conduct a race or race meeting under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 in
existence on November 1, 2020, which is located in the counties of Adams,
Dakota, Douglas, Hall, Lancaster, and Platte, may move such racetrack
location to another county in Nebraska that does not have a racetrack one
time only, subject to approval by the commission as provided in
subdivision (27) of section 9-1106, subsequent to the initial issuance of
the market analysis and socioeconomic-impact studies conducted pursuant
to section 9-1106.
Sec. 2. Section 2-1207, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
2-1207 (1) Within the enclosure of any racetrack where a race or
race meeting licensed and conducted under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 is
held or at a racetrack licensed to simulcast races or conduct interstate
simulcasting, the parimutuel method or system of wagering on the results
of the respective races may be used and conducted by the licensee. Under
such system, the licensee may receive wagers of money from any person
present at such race or racetrack receiving the simulcast race or
conducting interstate simulcasting on any horse in a race selected by
such person to run first in such race, and the person so wagering shall
acquire an interest in the total money so wagered on all horses in such
race as first winners in proportion to the amount of money wagered by him
or her. Such licensee shall issue to each person so wagering a
certificate on which shall be shown the number of the race, the amount
wagered, and the number or name of the horse selected by such person as
first winner. As each race is run, at the option of the licensee, the
licensee may deduct from the total sum wagered on all horses as first
winners not less than fifteen percent or more than eighteen percent from
such total sum, plus the odd cents of the redistribution over the next
lower multiple of ten. At the option of the licensee, the licensee may
deduct up to and including twenty-five percent from the total sum wagered
-4-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
by exotic wagers as defined in section 2-1208.03. The commission may
authorize other levels of deduction on wagers conducted by means of
interstate simulcasting. The licensee shall notify the commission in
writing of the percentages the licensee intends to deduct during the live
race meet conducted by the licensee and shall notify the commission at
least one week in advance of any changes to such percentages the licensee
intends to make. The licensee shall also deduct from the total sum
wagered by exotic wagers, if any, the tax plus the odd cents of the
redistribution over the next multiple of ten as provided in subsection
(1) of section 2-1208.04. The balance remaining on hand shall be paid out
to the holders of certificates on the winning horse in the proportion
that the amount wagered by each certificate holder bears to the total
amount wagered on all horses in such race to run first. The licensee may
likewise receive such wagers on horses selected to run second, third, or
both, or in such combinations as the commission may authorize, the
method, procedure, and authority and right of the licensee, as well as
the deduction allowed to the licensee, to be as specified with respect to
wagers upon horses selected to run first.
(2) At all race meets held pursuant to this section, the licensee
shall deduct from the total sum wagered one-third of the amount over
fifteen percent deducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section on
wagers on horses selected to run first, second, or third and one percent
of all exotic wagers to be used to promote agriculture and horse breeding
in Nebraska and for the support and preservation of horseracing pursuant
to section 2-1207.01. Money deducted for such purposes shall be given by
the licensee of the track where the funds were generated to the official
registrar for each breed for distribution as designated in section
2-1207.01.
(3) No person under twenty-one years of age shall be permitted to
make any parimutuel wager, and there shall be no wagering on horseracing
except under the parimutuel method outlined in this section. Any person,
-5-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
association, or corporation who knowingly aids or abets a person under
twenty-one years of age in making a parimutuel wager shall be guilty of a
Class I misdemeanor.
(4) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any parimutuel winnings as defined in section 9-1303,
an authorized gaming operator or licensee licensed to conduct parimutuel
wagering shall check the collection system to determine if the winner has
a debt or an outstanding state tax liability as required by the Gambling
Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If such authorized gaming
operator or licensee determines that the winner is subject to the
collection system, the operator shall deduct the amount of debt and
outstanding state tax liability identified in the collection system from
the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings payment of
parimutuel winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount deducted to the
Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or outstanding
state tax liability as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 3. Section 2-1207.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1207.01 (1) The amount deducted from wagers pursuant to subsection
(2) of section 2-1207 may be used to promote agriculture and
horsebreeding in Nebraska and shall be distributed as described in this
section as purse supplements and breeder and stallion awards for
Nebraska-bred horses, as defined and registered pursuant to section
2-1213, at the racetrack where the funds were generated. The official
registrar for each breed, as established in section 2-1213, shall
distribute purse supplements and breeder and stallion awards and shall
annually spend a minimum of eighty percent of all amounts deducted
pursuant to subsection (2) of section 2-1207 on such purse supplements
and breeder and stallion awards. , except that
(2)(a) If if a racetrack does not continue to conduct live race
-6-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
meets, amounts deducted may be distributed as purse supplements and
breeder and stallion awards at racetracks that conduct live race meets of
the same breed of horse that has primarily run in live race meets at such
track.
(b) Amounts and amounts deducted pursuant to a contract with the
organization representing the majority of the licensed owners and
trainers at the racetrack's most recent live thoroughbred race meet shall
be used by that organization to promote live thoroughbred horseracing in
the state or as purse supplements at racetracks that conduct live
thoroughbred race meets in the state.
(c) Amounts deducted pursuant to a contract between the organization
representing the majority of licensed owners and trainers at the
racetrack's most recent live quarterhorse race meet shall be used by such
organization to promote live quarterhorse race meets in the state.
(3) Any costs incurred by the commission pursuant to this section
and subsection (2) of section 2-1207 shall be separately accounted for
and be deducted from such funds.
Sec. 4. Section 2-1210, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
2-1210 (1) For purposes of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218, licensed
racetrack enclosure means all real property licensed and utilized for the
conduct of a race meeting, including the racetrack and any grandstand,
concession stand, office, barn, barn area, employee housing facility,
parking lot, and additional area designated by the commission in
accordance with the Constitution of Nebraska and applicable Nebraska law.
(2) The Nebraska State Fair Board, a county fair board, a county
agricultural society for the improvement of agriculture organized under
the County Agricultural Society Act, or a corporation or association of
persons organized and carried on for civic purposes or which conducts a
livestock exposition for the promotion of the livestock or horse-breeding
industries of the state and which does not permit its members to derive
-7-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
personal profit from its activities by way of dividends or otherwise may
apply in a manner prescribed by the commission for a racetrack enclosure
license to operate a licensed racetrack enclosure along with an
application fee of ten thousand dollars. A racetrack enclosure license
shall be valid for a period of up to three years. Such license may be
renewed in a manner prescribed by the commission, and such application
for renewal shall be accompanied by a fee of ten thousand dollars.
(3) A racetrack enclosure license issued pursuant to this section
for purposes of operating a licensed racetrack enclosure is separate and
distinct from the license required to conduct horseracing meets issued
pursuant to section 2-1204.
(4) A licensee holding a license to conduct horseracing meets at a
designated place within the state pursuant to section 2-1204 prior to
September 3, 2025, shall be deemed to hold a racetrack enclosure license
for such designated place within the state for purposes of this section
and the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act until the commission acts upon the
licensee's application for a racetrack enclosure license under this
section.
Sec. 5. Section 2-1213, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1213 (1)(a) No license shall be granted for racing on more than
one racetrack in any one county, except that the commission may, in its
discretion, grant a license to any county agricultural society to conduct
racing during its county fair notwithstanding a license may have been
issued for racing on another track in such county.
(b) Since the purpose of sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 is to encourage
agriculture and horse breeding in Nebraska, every licensee shall hold at
least one race on each racing day limited to Nebraska-bred horses,
including thoroughbreds or quarterhorses. Three percent of the first
money of every purse won by a Nebraska-bred horse shall be paid to the
breeder of such horse.
-8-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
(2) For purposes of this section, Nebraska-bred horse shall mean a
horse registered with the Nebraska Thoroughbred or Quarter Horse Registry
and meeting the following requirements: (a) It shall have been foaled in
Nebraska; (b) its dam shall have been registered, prior to foaling, with
the Nebraska Thoroughbred or Quarter Horse Registry; and (c) its dam
shall have been continuously in Nebraska for ninety days immediately
prior to foaling, except that such ninety-day period may be reduced to
thirty days in the case of a mare in foal which is purchased at a
nationally recognized thoroughbred or quarterhorse blood stock sale, the
name and pedigree of the mare being listed in the sale catalog, and which
is brought into this state and remains in this state for thirty days
immediately prior to foaling.
(3) The requirement that a dam shall be continuously in Nebraska for
either ninety days or thirty days, as specified in subdivision (2)(c) of
this section, shall not apply to a dam which is taken outside of Nebraska
to be placed for sale at a nationally recognized thoroughbred or
quarterhorse blood stock sale, the name and pedigree of the mare being
listed in the sale catalog, or for the treatment of an extreme sickness
or injury, if written notice of such proposed sale or treatment is
provided to the secretary of the commission within three days of the date
such horse is taken out of the state.
(4) The commission shall may designate official registrars for the
purpose of registration and to certify the eligibility of Nebraska-bred
horses. An official registrar shall perform such duties in accordance
with policies and procedures adopted and promulgated by the commission in
the current rules and regulations of the commission. The commission may
authorize the official registrar to collect specific fees as would
reasonably compensate the registrar for expenses incurred in connection
with registration of Nebraska-bred horses. The amount of such fee or fees
shall be established by the commission and shall not be changed without
commission approval. Fees shall not exceed two one hundred dollars per
-9-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
horse.
(5) A horse of any breed that meets the requirements of subsection
(2) of this section to be eligible for registration with the Nebraska
Thoroughbred or Quarter Horse Registry shall be registered with the
appropriate official registrar designated by the commission within ninety
days of being born. An owner or breeder that fails to register a horse
that meets the requirements of subsection (2) of this section to qualify
as a Nebraska-bred horse within such timeframe shall be subject to an
administrative fee of up to one thousand dollars payable to the official
registrar for the applicable breed. Any such fee shall be used to cover
the costs of administering the official registrar's statutory duties.
(6) Any decision or action taken by the official registrar shall be
subject to review by the commission or may be taken up by the commission
on its own initiative.
Sec. 6. Section 2-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1216 The parimutuel system of wagering on the results of
horseraces, when conducted pursuant to section 2-1207 within the
racetrack enclosure at licensed horserace meetings, shall not under any
circumstances be held or construed to be unlawful, any other statutes of
the State of Nebraska to the contrary notwithstanding. The money inuring
to the commission under sections 2-1201 to 2-1218 relating to horseracing
from permit fees or from other sources shall never be considered as
license money. It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds
arising under such sections be construed as general revenue to be
appropriated and allocated exclusively for the specific purposes set
forth in such sections.
Sec. 7. Section 2-1226, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1226 Any racetrack issued a license under sections 2-1201 to
2-1223 which operates at least one live race meet during each calendar
-10-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
year except as provided in section 2-1228 may apply to the commission for
a simulcast facility license. An application for such license shall be in
such form as may be prescribed by the commission and shall contain such
information, material, or evidence as the commission may require. Any
racetrack issued a simulcast facility license may display the simulcast
of a horserace on which parimutuel wagering shall be allowed.
Sec. 8. Section 2-1228, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1228 Any racetrack issued a license under sections 2-1201 to
2-1223 (1) conducting primarily quarterhorse races in the year
immediately preceding the year for which application is made , regardless
of the total number of days of live racing conducted in such year, or (2)
conducting primarily thoroughbred horseraces in the year immediately
preceding the year for which application is made which conducted live
racing on at least seventy percent of the days for which it was
authorized to conduct live racing in 1988 unless the commission
determines that such racetrack was unable to conduct live racing on the
required number of days due to factors beyond its control, including, but
not limited to, fire, earthquake, tornado, or other natural disaster, may
apply to the commission for an interstate simulcast facility license. An
application for such license shall be in a form prescribed by the
commission and shall contain such information, material, or evidence as
the commission may require. Any racetrack issued an interstate simulcast
facility license may conduct the interstate simulcast of any horserace
permitted under its license, and parimutuel wagering shall be allowed on
such horserace. The commission shall not authorize interstate
simulcasting for any racetrack pursuant to sections 2-1201 to 2-1223
unless all of the thoroughbred racetracks together applied for and
received authority to conduct at least one hundred eighty live racing
days in the calendar year in which the application is made. If any
racetrack conducts live racing for less than seventy percent of the days
-11-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
assigned such racetrack in 1988, (a) such racetrack shall be precluded
from conducting interstate simulcasts and (b) the number of live racing
days conducted by such racetrack shall be subtracted from an amount equal
to seventy percent of all the days assigned such racetrack in 1988 and
the amount remaining shall be deducted from the one-hundred-eighty-day
total required by this section. If any racetrack ceases to conduct live
racing, seventy percent of the days assigned such racetrack in 1988 shall
be deducted from the one-hundred-eighty-day total required by this
section.
Sec. 9. Section 2-1229, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
2-1229 (1) The commission may authorize and approve an application
for an interstate simulcast facility license by any a receiving track
within the state to receive the interstate simulcast of horseraces for
parimutuel wagering purposes from any track located outside of the state.
In determining whether such application should be approved, the
commission shall consider whether such interstate simulcast would have a
significant effect upon either live racing or the simulcasting of live
racing of the same type and at the same time conducted in this state and
whether it would expand the access to or availability of simulcasting to
areas of the state or markets which are not at the time of the
application fully served.
(2)(a) Prior to approving any such application from a track running
primarily thoroughbred horseraces, the commission shall confer with and
receive any recommendations of the organization which represents the
majority of the thoroughbred breeders in Nebraska as to what effect an
interstate simulcast would have upon thoroughbred horse breeding and
horseracing in this state. Prior to approving any such application from a
track running primarily quarterhorse horseraces, the commission shall
confer with and receive recommendation of the organization which
represents the majority of quarterhorse breeders in Nebraska as to what
-12-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
effect an interstate simulcast would have upon quarterhorse breeding and
horseracing in this state.
(b) No application submitted under section 2-1228 shall be approved
by the commission without:
(i) (a) The prior written approval of any other racetrack issued a
license under sections 2-1201 to 2-1223 and conducting live racing of the
same type on the same day at the same time as the proposed interstate
simulcast race or races and of the organization which represented a
majority of the licensed owners and trainers at the racetrack's
immediately preceding live thoroughbred or quarterhorse race meeting;
(ii) (b) The prior written approval of any other racetrack issued a
license under sections 2-1224 to 2-1227 which is simulcasting the racing
program of any licensee conducting live racing in this state of the same
type on the same day at the same time as the proposed interstate
simulcast race or races and of the organization which represented a
majority of the licensed owners and trainers at the racetrack's
immediately preceding live thoroughbred race meeting; and
(iii) (c) A written agreement between the receiving track and the
sending track located outside of the state in any other state, territory,
or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico setting forth the division of all proceeds
between the sending and receiving tracks and all other conditions under
which such interstate simulcast will be conducted. Such written agreement
shall have the consent of the group representing the majority of
horsepersons racing at the sending track and of the organization which
represented a majority of the licensed owners and trainers at the
receiving track's immediately preceding live thoroughbred race meeting.
(3) (2) Every licensee authorized to accept wagers on interstate
simulcast events pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be
conducting a licensed horserace meeting and shall also be subject to all
appropriate provisions of sections 2-1201 to 2-1223 relating to the
-13-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
conduct of horserace meetings.
Sec. 10. Section 9-1,101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
9-1,101 (1) The Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, and section
9-701 shall be administered and enforced by the Charitable Gaming
Division of the Department of Revenue, which division is hereby created.
The Department of Revenue shall make annual reports to the Governor,
Legislature, Auditor of Public Accounts, and Attorney General on all tax
revenue received, expenses incurred, and other activities relating to the
administration and enforcement of such acts. The report submitted to the
Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
(2) The Charitable Gaming Operations Fund is hereby created. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3)(a) Forty percent of the taxes collected pursuant to sections
9-239, 9-344, 9-429, and 9-648 shall be available to the Charitable
Gaming Division for administering and enforcing the acts listed in
subsection (1) of this section and to the State Racing and Gaming
Commission for providing administrative support for the Nebraska
Commission on Problem Gambling. The remaining sixty percent shall be
transferred to the General Fund. Any portion of the forty percent not
used by the division in the administration and enforcement of such acts
and section shall be distributed as provided in this subsection.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026, on or before the
last day of the last month of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer
shall transfer one hundred thousand dollars from the Charitable Gaming
Operations Fund to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund.
(c) Any money remaining in the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund
-14-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
after the transfer pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection not
used by the Charitable Gaming Division in its administration and
enforcement duties pursuant to this section may be transferred to the
General Fund and the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall employ investigators who shall be
vested with the authority and power of a law enforcement officer to carry
out the laws of this state administered by the Tax Commissioner or the
Department of Revenue and to enforce sections 28-1101 to 28-1117 relating
to possession of a gambling device. For purposes of enforcing sections
28-1101 to 28-1117, the authority of the investigators shall be limited
to investigating possession of a gambling device, notifying local law
enforcement authorities, and reporting suspected violations to the county
attorney for prosecution.
(5) The Charitable Gaming Division may charge a fee for publications
and listings it produces. The fee shall not exceed the cost of
publication and distribution of such items. The division may also charge
a fee for making a copy of any record in its possession equal to the
actual cost per page. The division shall remit the fees to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund.
(6) The taxes collected and available to the Charitable Gaming
Division pursuant to section 77-3012 shall be used by the division for
enforcement of the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and maintenance of
the central server established pursuant to section 77-3013.
(7) For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on
Problem Gambling shall be located within the Charitable Gaming Division.
The division shall provide office space, furniture, equipment, and
stationery and other necessary supplies for the commission. Commission
staff shall be appointed, supervised, and terminated by the director of
the Gamblers Assistance Program pursuant to section 9-1004.
Sec. 11. Section 9-831, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
-15-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
amended to read:
9-831 The division shall spend not less than five percent of the
advertising budget for the state lottery on problem gambling prevention,
education, and awareness messages. The division shall collaborate with
the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling to coordinate messages
developed under this section with the prevention, education, and
awareness messages in use by or developed in conjunction with the
Gamblers Assistance Program established pursuant to section 9-1005. For
purposes of this section, the advertising budget for the state lottery
includes amounts budgeted and spent for advertising, promotions,
incentives, public relations, marketing, or contracts for the purchase or
lease of goods or services that include advertising, promotions,
incentives, public relations, or marketing, but does not include in-kind
contributions by media outlets.
Sec. 12. Section 9-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1001 The Legislature finds that the main sources of funding for
assistance to problem gamblers are the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund
as provided in section 9-1,101, annual gaming tax proceeds as provided in
section 9-1204, and the State Lottery Operation Trust Fund as provided in
section 9-812. It is the intent of the Legislature that such funding be
used primarily for counseling and treatment services for problem gamblers
and their families who are residents of Nebraska.
Sec. 13. Section 9-1002, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1002 For purposes of sections 9-1001 to 9-1006 9-1007:
(1) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling;
(2) Division means the Charitable Gaming Division of the Department
of Revenue;
(2) (3) Problem gambling means maladaptive gambling behavior that
disrupts personal, family, or vocational pursuits; and
-16-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
(3) (4) Program means the Gamblers Assistance Program.
Sec. 14. Section 9-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1003 (1) The Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling is created.
For administrative purposes only, the Nebraska Commission on Problem
Gambling commission shall be within the State Racing and Gaming
Commission division. The commission shall have nine members appointed by
the Governor as provided in this section, subject to confirmation by a
majority of the members of the Legislature. The members of the Nebraska
Commission on Problem Gambling commission shall have no pecuniary
interest, either directly or indirectly, in a contract with the program
providing services to problem gamblers and shall not be employed by the
commission or the State Racing and Gaming Commission Department of
Revenue.
(2) By July 1, 2013, the Governor shall appoint members of the
Nebraska Commission on Problem Gambling commission as follows:
(a) One member with medical care or mental health expertise;
(b) One member with expertise in banking and finance;
(c) One member with legal expertise;
(d) One member with expertise in the field of education;
(e) Two members who are consumers of problem gambling services;
(f) One member with data analysis expertise; and
(g) Two members who are residents of the state and are
representative of the public at large.
(3) The terms of the members shall be for three years, except that
the Governor shall designate three of the initial appointees to serve
initial terms beginning on July 1, 2013, and ending on March 1, 2014,
three of the initial appointees to serve initial terms beginning on July
1, 2013, and ending on March 1, 2015, and three of the initial appointees
to serve initial terms beginning on July 1, 2013, and ending on March 1,
2016. The Governor shall appoint members to fill vacancies in the same
-17-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
manner as the original appointments, and such appointees shall serve for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2013, the commission shall adopt bylaws
governing its operation and the commission shall meet at least four times
each calendar year and may meet more often on the call of the
chairperson. Each member shall attend at least two meetings each calendar
year and shall be subject to removal for failure to attend at least two
meetings unless excused by a majority of the members of the commission.
Meetings of the commission are subject to the Open Meetings Act.
Sec. 15. Section 9-1004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1004 (1) The commission shall appoint one of its members as
chairperson and such other officers as it deems appropriate. Members
shall be reimbursed for expenses in carrying out their duties as members
of the commission as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(2) The commission shall develop guidelines and standards for the
operation of the program and shall direct the distribution and
disbursement of money in the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund.
(3) The commission shall appoint a director of the program, provide
for office space and equipment, and support and facilitate the work of
the program. The director may hire, terminate, and supervise commission
and program staff, shall be responsible for the duties of the office and
the administration of the program, and shall electronically provide an
annual report to the General Affairs Committee of the Legislature which
includes issues and policy concerns that relate to problem gambling in
Nebraska. All documents, files, equipment, effects, and records belonging
to the State Committee on Problem Gambling on June 30, 2013, shall become
the property of the commission on July 1, 2013.
(4) The commission shall (a) provide for a process for the
evaluation and approval of provider applications and contracts for
treatment and other services funded from the Compulsive Gamblers
-18-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
Assistance Fund and (b) develop standards and guidelines for training and
certification of problem gambling counselors.
(5) The commission shall provide for (a) the review and use of
evaluation data, (b) the use and expenditure of funds for education
regarding problem gambling and prevention of problem gambling, and (c)
the creation and implementation of outreach and educational programs
regarding problem gambling for Nebraska residents.
(6) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
and engage in other activities it finds necessary to carry out its duties
under sections 9-1001 to 9-1006 9-1007.
(7) The commission shall submit a report within sixty days after the
end of each fiscal year to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature
that provides details of the administration of the program and
distribution of funds from the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund. The
report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 16. Section 9-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1006 The Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund is created. The fund
shall include revenue transferred from the State Lottery Operation Trust
Fund under section 9-812 and the Charitable Gaming Operations Fund under
section 9-1,101 and any other revenue received by the division or
commission for credit to the fund from any other public or private
source, including, but not limited to, distributions of annual gaming tax
proceeds as provided in section 9-1204, appropriations, grants,
donations, gifts, devises, bequests, fees, or reimbursements. The
commission shall administer the fund for the operation of the Gamblers
Assistance Program. The Director of Administrative Services shall draw
warrants upon the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund upon the
presentation of proper vouchers by the commission. Money from the
Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund shall be used exclusively for the
purpose of providing assistance to agencies, groups, organizations, and
-19-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
individuals that provide education, assistance, and counseling to
individuals and families experiencing difficulty as a result of problem
gambling, to promote the awareness of problem gamblers assistance
programs, and to pay the costs and expenses of the Gamblers Assistance
Program, including travel. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 17. Section 9-1104, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
9-1104 (1) The operation of games of chance at a licensed racetrack
enclosure may be conducted by an authorized gaming operator who holds an
authorized gaming operator license.
(2) No more than one authorized gaming operator license shall be
granted for each licensed racetrack enclosure within the state. It shall
not be a requirement that the person or entity applying for or to be
granted such authorized gaming operator license hold a racing license or
be the same person or entity who operates the licensed racetrack
enclosure at which such authorized gaming operator license shall be
granted.
(3) Gaming devices, limited gaming devices, and all other games of
chance may be operated by authorized gaming operators at a licensed
racetrack enclosure.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, no
(4) No person younger than twenty-one years of age shall play or
participate in any way in any game of chance or use any gaming device or
limited gaming device at a licensed racetrack enclosure.
(b) A person nineteen years of age or older shall be allowed to play
or participate in a keno lottery conducted in accordance with the
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act at a licensed racetrack enclosure as
long as such keno lottery is played in an area separate from the casino
-20-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
gaming floor where other games of chance are played.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, no
(5) No authorized gaming operator shall permit an individual younger than
twenty-one years of age to play or participate in any game of chance or
use any gaming device or limited gaming device conducted or operated
pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.
(b) An authorized gaming operator may permit a person nineteen years
of age or older to play or participate in a keno lottery conducted in
accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act at a licensed
racetrack enclosure as long as such keno lottery is played in an area
separate from the casino gaming floor where other games of chance are
played.
(6) Except as provided in any waiver or modification approved by the
commission pursuant to section 2-1205, if If the licensed racetrack
enclosure at which such authorized gaming operator conducts games of
chance does not hold the minimum number of live racing meets required
under section 2-1205, the authorized gaming operator shall be required to
cease operating games of chance at such licensed racetrack enclosure
until such time as the commission determines the deficiency has been
corrected.
(7) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any casino winnings as defined in section 9-1303, an
authorized gaming operator shall check the collection system to determine
if the winner has a debt or an outstanding state liability as required by
the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If such authorized
gaming operator determines that the winner is subject to the collection
system, the operator shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding
state liability identified in the collection system from the winnings
payment and shall remit the net winnings payment of casino winnings, if
any, to the winner and the amount deducted to the Department of Revenue
-21-

LB766 LB766
2026 2026
to be credited against such debt or outstanding state liability as
provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 18. Section 9-1115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1115 (1) A person who knowingly permits an individual whom the
person knows is younger than twenty-one years of age to participate in a
game of chance is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(2) A person who participates in a game of chance when such person
is younger than twenty-one years of age at the time of participation is
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(3) This section does not apply to (a) a person who permits an
individual who is nineteen years of age or older to participate in a keno
lottery conducted in accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery
Act at a licensed racetrack enclosure as long as such keno lottery is
played in an area separate from the casino gaming floor where other games
of chance are played or (b) a person nineteen years of age or older who
participates in a keno lottery conducted in accordance with the Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act at a licensed racetrack enclosure as long as
such keno lottery is played in an area separate from the casino gaming
floor where other games of chance are played.
Sec. 19. Original sections 2-1207.01, 2-1213, 2-1216, 2-1226,
2-1228, 2-1229, 9-831, 9-1001, 9-1002, 9-1003, 9-1004, 9-1006, and
9-1115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 2-1207, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 2-1205, 2-1210,
9-1,101, and 9-1104, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 20. The following section is outright repealed: Section
9-1107, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025.
-22-